Hawaii statutes.
§46-4 County zoning. (a) This section
and any ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted in accordance with this section
shall apply to lands not contained within the forest reserve boundaries as
established on January 31, 1957, or as subsequently amended.

Zoning in all counties shall be accomplished
within the framework of a long-range, comprehensive general plan prepared or
being prepared to guide the overall future development of the county. Zoning
shall be one of the tools available to the county to put the general plan into
effect in an orderly manner. Zoning in the counties of Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai
means the establishment of districts of such number, shape, and area, and the
adoption of regulations for each district to carry out the purposes of this
section. In establishing or regulating the districts, full consideration shall
be given to all available data as to soil classification and physical use
capabilities of the land to allow and encourage the most beneficial use of the
land consonant with good zoning practices. The zoning power granted herein
shall be exercised by ordinance which may relate to:

(1) The areas within which agriculture, forestry,
industry, trade, and business may be conducted;

(2) The areas in which residential uses may be regulated
or prohibited;

(3) The areas bordering natural watercourses,
channels, and streams, in which trades or industries, filling or dumping,
erection of structures, and the location of buildings may be prohibited or
restricted;

(4) The areas in which particular uses may be
subjected to special restrictions;

(5) The location of buildings and structures designed
for specific uses and designation of uses for which buildings and structures
may not be used or altered;

(6) The location, height, bulk, number of stories,
and size of buildings and other structures;

(7) The location of roads, schools, and recreation
areas;

(8) Building setback lines and future street lines;

(9) The density and distribution of population;

(10) The percentage of a lot that may be occupied,
size of yards, courts, and other open spaces;

(11) Minimum and maximum lot sizes; and

(12) Other regulations the boards or city council find
necessary and proper to permit and encourage the orderly development of land
resources within their jurisdictions.

The council of any county shall prescribe
rules, regulations, and administrative procedures and provide personnel it
finds necessary to enforce this section and any ordinance enacted in accordance
with this section. The ordinances may be enforced by appropriate fines and
penalties, civil or criminal, or by court order at the suit of the county or
the owner or owners of real estate directly affected by the ordinances.

Any civil fine or penalty provided by ordinance
under this section may be imposed by the district court, or by the zoning
agency after an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to chapter 91. The
proceeding shall not be a prerequisite for any injunctive relief ordered by the
circuit court.

Nothing in this section shall invalidate any
zoning ordinance or regulation adopted by any county or other agency of
government pursuant to the statutes in effect prior to July 1, 1957.

The powers granted herein shall be liberally
construed in favor of the county exercising them, and in such a manner as to
promote the orderly development of each county or city and county in accordance
with a long-range, comprehensive general plan to ensure the greatest benefit
for the State as a whole. This section shall not be construed to limit or
repeal any powers of any county to achieve these ends through zoning and
building regulations, except insofar as forest and water reserve zones are
concerned and as provided in subsections (c) and (d).

Neither this section nor any ordinance enacted
pursuant to this section shall prohibit the continued lawful use of any
building or premises for any trade, industrial, residential, agricultural, or
other purpose for which the building or premises is used at the time this
section or the ordinance takes effect; provided that a zoning ordinance may
provide for elimination of nonconforming uses as the uses are discontinued, or
for the amortization or phasing out of nonconforming uses or signs over a
reasonable period of time in commercial, industrial, resort, and apartment
zoned areas only. In no event shall such amortization or phasing out of
nonconforming uses apply to any existing building or premises used for
residential (single-family or duplex) or agricultural uses. Nothing in this
section shall affect or impair the powers and duties of the director of
transportation as set forth in chapter 262.

(b) Any final order of a zoning agency
established under this section may be appealed to the circuit court of the
circuit in which the land in question is found. The appeal shall be in
accordance with the Hawaii rules of civil procedure.

(c) Each county may adopt reasonable standards
to allow the construction of two single-family dwelling units on any lot where
a residential dwelling unit is permitted.

(d) Neither this section nor any other law,
county ordinance, or rule shall prohibit group living in facilities with eight
or fewer residents for purposes or functions that are licensed, certified,
registered, or monitored by the State; provided that a resident manager or a
resident supervisor and the resident manager's or resident supervisor's family
shall not be included in this resident count. These group living facilities
shall meet all applicable county requirements not inconsistent with the intent
of this subsection, including but not limited to building height, setback,
maximum lot coverage, parking, and floor area requirements.

(e) Neither this section nor any other law,
county ordinance, or rule shall prohibit the use of land for employee housing
and community buildings in plantation community subdivisions as defined in
section 205-4.5(a)(12); in addition, no zoning ordinance shall provide for the
elimination, amortization, or phasing out of plantation community subdivisions
as a nonconforming use.

(f) Neither this section nor any other law,
county ordinance, or rule shall prohibit the use of land for medical marijuana
production centers or medical marijuana dispensaries established and licensed
pursuant to chapter 329D; provided that the land is otherwise zoned for
agriculture, manufacturing, or retail purposes. [L 1957, c 234, pt of §6 and
§9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§26, 38; am L 1965, c 140; Supp, §138-42; HRS §46-4;
am L 1980, c 203, §1; am L 1981, c 229, §2; am L 1982, c 54, §5; am L 1985, c
272, §3; am L 1986, c 177, §1; am L 1987, c 109, §2, c 193, §1, and c 283, §4;
am L 1988, c 141, §§5, 6 and c 252, §1; am L 1989, c 313, §1; am L 1990, c 67,
§3; am L 1997, c 350, §15; am L 2004, c 212, §2; am L 2005, c 139, §3; am L
2006, c 237, §2; am L 2007, c 249, §7; am L 2011, c 220, §§9, 10; am L 2014, c
193, §7; am L 2015, c 241, §3]

Cross References

Zoning within land use districts, see §§205-5, 6.

See also county charters.

Rules of Court

Appeal to circuit court, see HRCP rule 72.

Attorney General Opinions

Counties have the power to prescribe lot sizes within an
agricultural district established by the state land use commission. Att. Gen.
Op. 62-33.

Preempts conflicting county fire and building codes. Att.
Gen. Op. 84-7.

Immunity of state land from county planning and zoning laws
extends to private nonprofit lessee undertaking park project in public
interest. Att. Gen. Op. 86-3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Kaiser Hawaii Kai Development Company v. City and County of
Honolulu: Zoning by Initiative in Hawaii. 12 UH L. Rev. 181.

Honolulu's Ohana Zoning Law: To Ohana or Not to Ohana. 13
UH L. Rev. 505.

The Lum Court, Land Use, and the Environment: A Survey of
Hawai‘i Case Law
1983 to 1991. 14 UH L. Rev. 119.

The Manoa Valley Special District Ordinance: Community-Based
Planning in the Post-Lucas Era. 19 UH L. Rev. 449.

Water Regulation, Land Use and the Environment. 30 UH L.
Rev. 49.

Maui's Residential Workforce Housing Policy: Finding the
Boundaries of Inclusionary Zoning. 30 UH L. Rev. 447.

Case Notes

Kauai county charter section 3.19 and ordinance no. 912
created a land use classification that did not previously exist and established
the process developers must follow in order to use their land within that
classification. Section 3.19 was an improper zoning initiative and, pursuant
to Kaiser Hawaii Kai and subsection (a), section 3.19 was invalid. 955 F.
Supp. 2d 1156 (2013).

Where county officials assured developer that developer's
plans met zoning requirements and developer expended substantial sum in
reliance, the city was estopped from denying developer a building permit under
a subsequently enacted ordinance. 60 H. 446, 592 P.2d 26.

Section does not relate to a city's executive, legislative
and administrative structure and organization; zoning by initiative is
impermissible. 70 H. 480, 777 P.2d 244.

Public utilities commission has the authority to regulate the
height of utility poles. 72 H. 285, 814 P.2d 398.

As state water code expressly reserves the counties'
authority with respect to land use planning and policy, water resource
management commission allegedly imposing a "directive" on the
counties to designate priorities among proposed uses did not usurp counties'
land use planning and zoning authority. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Rezoning is a legislative function; a zoning ordinance is a
legislative act and is subject to the deference given legislative acts. 102 H.
465, 78 P.3d 1.

Where department of planning and permitting director's mixed
finding of fact and conclusion of law that a change in nonconforming use was
permitted under the land use ordinance was not supported by the record, the
appeals court erred when it concluded that the director's ruling "was
reasonably based on the evidence before the director and constituted a
reasonable application of the applicable zoning ordinance and the department's
previous interpretation of that ordinance". 121 H. 16, 211 P.3d 74.

Grandfather protections afforded a property owner under this
section and land use ordinance intended to prohibit new zoning ordinances from
interfering with an owner's lawful uses of a building or premises under an
existing zoning ordinance. 86 H. 343 (App.), 949 P.2d 183.

"Lawful use" and "previously lawful", as
used in this section and land use ordinance, respectively, refer to compliance
with previous zoning laws, not the building codes or other legal requirements
that may be applicable to the construction or operation of a structure. 86 H.
343 (App.), 949 P.2d 183.

Subsection (a) establishes a private right of action in favor
of a real estate owner directly affected by an alleged land use ordinance (LUO)
zoning violation to seek judicial enforcement of the LUO; thus, the circuit
court had original subject matter jurisdiction over plaintiffs’ zoning
enforcement claim; however, the circuit court’s jurisdiction was subject to the
doctrine of primary jurisdiction where the court was justified in requiring the
plaintiffs to first pursue an administrative determination of their claim that
defendants had been violating the LUO before proceeding with judicial
enforcement of the LUO. 127 H. 390 (App.), 279 P.3d 55 (2012).

Public trust duties under article XI, §1 of the Hawaii
constitution extended to appellee Kauai County planning commission's review of
appellant water bottling company's existing and proposed use of water for its
operations; the county's public trust duty under article XI, §1 coupled with
the State's power to create and delegate duties and responsibilities to the
various counties through the enactment of statutes, established that the county
had a duty to conserve and protect water in considering whether to issue a use
permit and zoning permit to appellant. 130 H. 407 (App.), 312 P.3d 283 (2013).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next